Massachusetts, session 194th, S1813.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Sub-section (c1/2) of sub-section (8) of section (22) of Chapter 32 is 
amended by deleting the third sentence and inserting the following: 
Any system found by the commission to have a funded ratio of less than fifty percent and 
an annual rate of return during the previous ten years that is at least three percentage points less 
than that of the PRIT Fund rate of return over the same period shall be declared underperforming 
by the commission. 
SECTION 2. The final sentence of a sub-section (c 1/2) of sub-section (8) of section 22of 
Chapter 32 is amended by deleting in the final sentence the words: "Shall be in perpetuity." and 
inserting: "May not be revoked for five years."